Washington statutes.
RCW 18.52.025

Authority of secretary of health.

In addition to any other authority provided by law, the secretary shall have the following authority:

(1) To set all fees required in this chapter in accordance with RCW 43.70.250 which may include fees for approval of continuing competency, supervision of practical experience, all applications, verification, renewal, examination, and late penalties;

(2) To establish forms necessary to administer this chapter;

(3) To issue a license to any applicant who has met the education, training, and examination requirements for licensure and deny a license to applicants who do not meet the minimum qualifications for licensure, except that proceedings concerning the denial of licenses based on unprofessional conduct or impaired practice shall be governed by the uniform disciplinary act, chapter 18.130 RCW;

(4) To employ clerical, administrative, and investigative staff as needed to implement and administer this chapter and to employ individuals including those licensed under this chapter to serve as examiners or consultants as necessary to implement and administer this chapter; and

(5) To maintain the official department record of all applicants and licensees.

[ 1992 c 53 s 2.]